Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 3 Operation and Regulation
7-1-668.
Conversion of state and federal credit unions.

Any credit union operating in this state may convert into a federal chartered credit union, and any federal credit union may convert into a credit union organized under this chapter upon approval of the authority under whose supervision the converted credit union will operate and upon compliance with applicable federal laws as to a converted federal credit union and upon compliance with applicable state laws as to a converted credit union. In the case of a federal credit union converting to a state credit union, such converting credit union may keep its existing members at the time of conversion, but after conversion eligibility for membership in the converted credit union must comply with state law. If there are other areas of noncompliance with state law, the credit union must provide the department with a plan to bring those areas into compliance with Georgia law within a reasonable period, to be determined by the department.

The procedure for obtaining such approval and effecting the conversions in the case of a credit union shall be as follows:

A meeting of the board of directors, either regular or special, shall be called for the purpose of voting on converting from a federal credit union to a credit union or from a credit union to a federal credit union. A majority of the board of directors shall adopt a resolution approving the contemplated conversion;

A meeting, either regular or special, of the members shall then be called for voting on the proposed conversion. Notice of said meeting shall be given in the manner prescribed in Code Section 7-1-6 and shall include a statement indicating that the proposed conversion will be considered at the meeting. Proof of giving of the notice shall be by the affidavit of the president of the credit union. A majority of the members present at this meeting shall then approve the proposed conversion; and

Within ten days after such approval of the conversion, the president or vice-president and treasurer shall file a verified copy of the resolution adopted by the board of directors with the state or federal authority under whose supervision the converting credit union is to operate.

The articles of conversion, which shall contain:

Its name and the name of the resulting credit union;

The street address and county of its main office;

The name and initial registered agent and the street address where the initial registered office will be located;

The votes by which the plan of conversion was adopted and the time, place, and notice of each meeting conducted in connection with such adoption;

The name and county of residence of each director of the resulting credit union;

The provisions required in articles of a new credit union by paragraphs (6), (7), and (8) of subsection (a) of Code Section 7-1-630; and

The plan of conversion;

The fees required by Code Section 7-1-862;

An application and information desired by the department in order to evaluate the proposed conversion, in the form specified by the department;

Applicable fees established by regulation of the department to defray the expenses of its investigation of the conversion application; and

A certificate from the Secretary of State showing that the proposed name of the resulting credit union has been reserved pursuant to Code Section 7-1-131;

(b.1)

In addition to the requirements of subsection (b) of this Code section, in the case of a federal credit union converting to a credit union:

Upon the issuance of the certificate of conversion by the Secretary of State, in accordance with the requirements in Code Section 7-1-554, and the written approval of the department for conversions to credit unions and with the written approval of the National Credit Union Administration for conversions to federal credit unions, the converting credit union shall then become a credit union under the laws of this state or the United States, as the case may be; and thereupon all assets shall become the property of the new credit union or federal credit union, as the case may be, subject to all existing liabilities, and every person who was a member of the converting credit union shall be a member in the new credit union or federal credit union.

Conversions by state chartered credit unions to financial institutions other than credit unions or financial institutions other than credit unions to state chartered credit unions shall be effected by approval of the department and compliance with any other applicable law. The department may prescribe other requirements in order to protect the rights of members or the funds invested.

In conversions by state chartered credit unions to financial institutions other than credit unions, procedures provided in subsection (b) of this Code section shall be followed for obtaining approval from the department and effecting such conversions, provided that two-thirds of the members voting shall be required to approve a proposed conversion.

In conversions by financial institutions other than credit unions to state chartered credit unions, the department shall prescribe procedures for financial institutions to seek approval from the department to convert to a credit union. Such procedures shall include:

The procedures provided in subsection (b) of this Code section;

The submission of a conversion plan by the converting financial institution. A conversion plan shall include the following, where applicable:

How the converting financial institution will comply with credit union membership requirements;

Plans for the divestment of its board of directors of stock options;

Plans for the divestment of capital stock;

Plans for the phase out of all impermissible investments;

Plans for compliance with credit union business loan limitations; and

Any other such information as required by the department; and

The converting financial institution shall perform a complete policy review to address appraisal restrictions, lending restrictions, investment restrictions, corporate structure restrictions, and power structure in order to ensure compliance with this article and regulations of the department.

The department may authorize a credit union resulting from a charter conversion under this Code section to do the following:

Complete any activities that the converting financial institution legally engaged in at the effective time of the charter conversion but that otherwise are not permitted for credit unions, provided that the transitional period during which such activities are carried out does not exceed five years after the effective date of the charter conversion; and

Retain for the transitional period any assets that the converting financial institution legally held at the effective time of the charter conversion that otherwise may not be held by credit unions, provided that such transitional period during which such assets are retained does not exceed five years after the effective date of the charter conversion.

(1)

The federal credit union shall file with the department:

(2)

The department shall conduct such investigation as it deems necessary to ascertain whether:

(A)

The articles of conversion and supporting items satisfy the requirements of this chapter;

(B)

The plan adequately protects the interests of depositors, other than creditors; and

(C)

The requirements for a conversion under all applicable laws have been satisfied and the resulting institution would satisfy the applicable requirements of this chapter; and

(3)

Within 90 days after receipt of the articles and all of the filings required by this subsection, the department shall, in its discretion, approve or disapprove the articles on the basis of its investigation and the criteria set forth in this Code section. If the department approves the application, it shall deliver written approval with a copy of the articles attached to the Secretary of State and notify the federal credit union, and any other parties to the plan, of its action, provided that, if approval of any federal agency is required, the department may elect to not act on the application until such federal approval is given. If the department disapproves the application, it shall give written notice to the federal credit union and any other parties to the plan of its disapproval and a statement to them generally of the reasons for its decision.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-3119, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 24/SB 82; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 7/HB 90; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 25/HB 184; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 21/HB 143; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 34/HB 111.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added subsection (b.1) and substituted “Upon the issuance of the certificate of conversion by the Secretary of State, in accordance with the requirements in Code Section 7-1-554, and the written approval” for “Upon the written approval” at the beginning of subsection (c).

7-1-669.
Central credit union.

A “central credit union” means a credit union which is organized to serve a field of membership which consists primarily of other credit unions operating pursuant to this chapter, any other state credit union law, or the Federal Credit Union Act. A central credit union may be organized and operated under this chapter and subject to all provisions of this chapter which are not inconsistent with this Code section. Such credit union shall use the word “central” in its name.

The field of membership of a central credit union shall include credit unions organized and operating under this chapter, any other state credit union law, or under the Federal Credit Union Act. In addition, the field of membership may include:

Members of credit unions which are members of the central credit union;

Officials and employees of any organization or association of credit unions and of the central credit union;

Except as limited in Article 1 of this chapter, employees of the department or of the National Credit Union Administration;

Organizations and associations of persons or credit unions included in the foregoing;

Persons who are:

Members of a credit union that has entered into voluntary or involuntary dissolution; or

Indebted to a credit union which has entered into voluntary or involuntary dissolution; or

Nonmember depositors of a credit union which has entered into voluntary or involuntary dissolution; and

Groups within a common bond which are determined by the commissioner to lack the potential membership required for approval of their own credit union.

The central credit union may make loans to individuals who are members pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of this Code section only upon approval of the credit committee of the member credit union of which the individual is a member and to individuals who are members pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of this Code section only upon reporting such loan to the appropriate supervisory authority.

The commissioner may, in his discretion, approve greater borrowings than provided in this chapter when required to enable the credit union to meet its obligations to its members and otherwise assist its members during any emergency or hardship.

A central credit union may:

Make loans to other credit unions, but loans to any one credit union shall not exceed:

For unsecured loans and lines of credit, excluding pass-through and guaranteed loans from the Central Liquidity Fund and the National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund, more than 50 percent of capital; or

For secured loans and lines of credit, excluding those secured by shares or marketable securities and member reverse repurchase transactions, more than 100 percent of capital.

For the purposes of this paragraph, the definition of capital shall be consistent with federal law and regulations.
The department may utilize other definitions found in the National Credit Union Administration rules and regulations in interpreting this subsection;

Make loans to other members as specified in Code Section 7-1-658;

Purchase shares of and make deposits in other credit unions;

Obtain or acquire the assets and liabilities of any credit union which enters into liquidation;

Invest in and grant loans to associations of credit unions and to organizations chartered to provide service to credit unions; and

Borrow money and accept deposits from any source.

The commissioner may issue such special regulations as he or she may deem prudent or necessary to allow a central credit union to promote effectively the liquidity and sound financial management of its member credit unions without unduly endangering its own liquidity and sound financial condition. Such special regulations need not be applicable to all credit unions but may be applicable only to the central credit union. The central credit union shall maintain an adequate allowance for loan and lease losses in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and such other reserves as may be required by the rules and regulations of the department.

A central credit union shall have all the rights and powers of any other credit union organized under this chapter and the additional rights and powers specified in this Code section.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-3120, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1220, § 9; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 25/SB 82; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 7/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 3-4/HB 811.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2005, “no” was deleted preceding “more than” in subparagraphs (e)(1)(A) and (e)(1)(B).

U.S. Code.

The Federal Credit Union Act, referred to in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, is codified as

12 U.S.C. § 1751

et seq.

7-1-670.
[Reserved] Third-party payment services.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-3121, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 417, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 602, § 19; Ga. L. 2001, p. 970, § 9; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 26/SB 82; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 16/SB 70; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 3-5/HB 811; repealed by Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 29/HB 891, effective July 1, 2022.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 29/HB 891 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2022.

7-1-671.
“Federal power” defined; construction with federal law; notifications; objections; authority; construction.

For purposes of this Code section, the term “federal power” means any banking or corporate power, right, benefit, privilege, or immunity of a federal credit union, the deposits of which are federally insured, that may be exercised by a federal credit union doing business in this state pursuant to the Federal Credit Union Act, 12 U.S.C. Section 1751, et seq.; any other federal statute; or any regulation, ruling, circular, bulletin, order, or interpretation issued by the National Credit Union Administration. Such term shall include only the provisions set forth above which were effective on January 1, 2018.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a credit union may exercise any federal power while a federal credit union may also exercise such power subject to the same limitations and restrictions as are applicable to federal credit unions, provided that the requirements of subsection (d) of this Code section have been satisfied. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as authorizing a credit union incorporated or organized in this state to exercise a federal power prior to compliance with subsection (d) of this Code section.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, to the extent the Federal Credit Union Act, 12 U.S.C. Section 1751, et seq., or any other federal law or regulation in effect on January 1, 2018, precludes or preempts or has been determined to preclude or preempt the application of any provision of law, rule, or regulation of this state as to any federal credit union doing business in this state, a credit union may also exercise such power authorized by the preclusion or preemption subject to the same limitations and restrictions as are applicable to a federal credit union, provided that the requirements of subsection (d) of this Code section have been satisfied. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as authorizing a credit union incorporated or organized in this state to exercise a federal power prior to compliance with subsection (d) of this Code section.

In furtherance of the commissioner’s statutory duties to regulate, supervise, and examine, a credit union shall notify the commissioner in writing by certified or registered mail that, pursuant to subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section, it intends to exercise a federal power or to avail itself of any federal preclusion or preemption of any provision of law, rule, or regulation of this state. Such notice shall include the specific federal authorization of the activity to be utilized, the proposed action to be undertaken by the credit union, documentation indicating that the credit union satisfies the prescribed federal standards, if any, to engage in the activity, and such other information as may be required by the department. Upon receipt of such notice, the commissioner shall determine whether the exercise of any federal power or the availing of any federal preclusion or preemption, or any part thereof, by the credit union is inconsistent with the purposes of this chapter or presents undue risk to the safety and soundness of the banking system. In making such a determination, the commissioner shall consider the financial condition of the credit union, the regulatory safety and soundness ratings of the credit union, the ability of credit union management to administer and supervise the activity, and the overall impact on the safety and soundness to all other state chartered credit unions. Based on such a determination, the commissioner may object to the exercise of the federal power, in whole or in part, or to the federal preclusion or preemption of the law, rule, or regulation of this state, in whole or in part, including objecting to a level or quantity above which a credit union may be seeking to exercise a federal power or availing itself of any federal preclusion or preemption of law, rule, or regulation of this state. If the commissioner so objects, the commissioner shall deliver such objection in writing by certified or registered mail to the credit union within 45 days of receipt of the notice; provided, however, that the commissioner may extend such period of review for an additional 45 days by providing the credit union with written notice of such extension prior to the expiration of the initial notice period. If the commissioner sends such an objection, the federal power, preclusion, or preemption, or the part thereof, objected to by the commissioner shall not be exercised by the credit union pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section. The objection by the commissioner of a credit union’s intent to exercise a federal power or avail itself of any federal preclusion or preemption shall not preclude such credit union from providing notice to the department of its intent to exercise the same federal power or to avail itself of the same federal preclusion or preemption at a later date; provided, however, that the requirements of this subsection shall be applicable for any such additional notice. Further, in the event a credit union determines, after satisfying the notice provisions of this subsection, that it no longer wishes to exercise a federal power or avail itself of any federal preclusion or preemption, then such credit union shall provide written notice of such fact to the commissioner by certified or registered mail.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 7-1-70, the department shall publish information stating the federal powers that are being exercised or federal preclusions or preemptions that are being utilized by each credit union. All other information related to the notices or objections provided under subsection (d) of this Code section are governed by Code Section 7-1-70.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a credit union may exercise any power that was granted through an order or ruling declared by the commissioner on or before January 1, 2018, pursuant to the current or former provisions of Code Section 7-1-61, 7-1-61.1, or 7-6A-12 and which has not been rescinded or withdrawn.

Any federal power or activity authorized and exercised or conducted pursuant to this Code section shall be independent from, and in addition to, any other powers granted to credit unions under applicable laws of this state or rules or regulations promulgated thereunder. The express and incidental powers granted to credit unions under the Official Code of Georgia Annotated are not limited or otherwise restricted by this Code section.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed as limiting the commissioner’s authority conferred by this chapter, including the powers granted under Code Sections 7-1-61 and 7-1-61.1.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed as authorizing the imposition of interest rates by a credit union in excess of those authorized by Chapter 4 of this title nor shall any provision of this Code section be construed as permitting a credit union to make loans in violation of Chapter 17 of Title 16.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-671

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 17/HB 780.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 3, 2018. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Notification of intent to utilize a federal power, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Banking and Finance, Banks, Applications, Registrations and Notifications, Rule 80-1-1-.12.